Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. Department of Conservation and Recreation.

§ 10.1-100.
Definitions.

As used in this subtitle, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Department”
means the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

History.

1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1988, c. 891, cl. 2, 4 and 5 provide: “2. That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 10 or any other title of this Code as such titles existed prior to July 1, 1988, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section, article or chapter of this title or any other title of this Code and whenever any such former section, article or chapter is given a new number in this or any other title, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 10 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.

“4. That this recodification of Title 10 as Title 10.1 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in Title 10.1 and each such officer and member shall continue to serve the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 10.

“5. That this act shall be deemed to have been enacted prior to any other act enacted in the 1988 regular session of the General Assembly, and any act purporting to amend and reenact any law contained in Title 10 or Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia is deemed to be added to, amendatory of, or a repealer of, as the case may be, any corresponding law contained in this act; provided, that effect shall be given to such other or subsequent act only to the extent of any apparent changes in the law as it existed prior to the commencement of such session.”

Law Review.

For article addressing significant developments in Virginia law pertaining to air quality, water quality and solid and hazardous waste, between 1990 and 1992, see “Environmental Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 729 (1992).

For an article, “The Rhetoric and Reality of Nature Protection:
Toward a New Discourse,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 11 (2000).

Research References.

Environmental Law in Real Estate and Business Transactions (Matthew Bender). Berz, Spracker, Strochak.

Environmental Law Practice Guide (Matthew Bender). Gerard.

The Law of Hazardous Waste (Matthew Bender). Cooke.

Treatise on Environmental Law (Matthew Bender). Grad.

§ 10.1-101.
Department continued; appointment of Director.

The Department of Conservation and Historic Resources is continued as the Department of Conservation and Recreation. The Department shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Governor to serve at his pleasure for a term coincident with his own.

History.

1984, c. 750, § 10-252; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656.

§ 10.1-102.
Powers and duties of Director.

The Director, under the direction and control of the Governor, shall exercise the powers and perform the duties that are conferred upon him by law and he shall perform such other duties as may be required of him by the Governor or the appropriate citizen boards.

History.

1984, c. 750, § 10-252.1; 1988, c. 891.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 348, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation (the Department) shall develop recommendations for one or more dedicated sources of funding for the system of state parks in the Commonwealth. Such funding source shall be relatively stable from year to year. In developing its recommendations, the Department may meet with and seek input from stakeholders. The Department shall submit its recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations no later than November 1, 2021.”

§ 10.1-103.
Organization of the Department.

The Director shall establish divisions through which the functions of the Department and the corresponding powers and duties may be exercised and discharged.
The Director shall appoint competent persons to direct the various functions and programs of the Department, and may delegate any of the powers and duties conferred or imposed by law upon him.

History.

1984, c. 750, § 10-253; 1986, c. 567; 1987, c. 234; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656.

§ 10.1-104.
Powers of the Department.

The Department shall have the following powers, which may be delegated by the Director:

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out those duties conferred by law;

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including but not limited to contracts with private nonprofit organizations, the United States, other state agencies and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To accept bequests and gifts of real and personal property as well as endowments, funds, and grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable;

To prescribe rules and regulations necessary or incidental to the performance of duties or execution of powers conferred by law;

To establish noncompetitively procured contracts, notwithstanding the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§ 2.2-4300 et seq.), with private nonprofit organizations that are exempt from federal taxation, to conduct revenue producing activities on Department lands provided the revenue generated after expenses is used to benefit Virginia State Parks and the Natural Area Preserve System. This subsection shall not provide for establishing contracts for capital improvements to state-owned facilities or on Department lands;

To establish the Office of Environmental Education to provide increased opportunities for public education programs on environmental issues. The Office shall initiate and supervise programs designed to educate citizens on ecology, pollution and its control, technology and its relationship to environmental problems and their solutions, population and its relationship to environmental problems, and other matters concerning environmental quality;

To perform acts necessary or convenient to carry out the duties conferred by law; and

To assess civil penalties for violations of §

10.1-200.3

.

Pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.), the Department may promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this subtitle. A violation of any regulation shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor, unless a different penalty is prescribed by the Code of Virginia. However, a violation of the Virginia State Park Regulations (4 VAC 5-30) shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1984, c. 739, §§ 10-21.3:4, 10-21.3:5; 1984, c. 750, § 10-254; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 370; 2007, c. 632; 2009, c. 392; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 370, in subsection A, added subdivision 6 and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 632 added the last sentence in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 392 added subdivision A 5 and redesignated former subdivisions A 5 and A 6 as subdivisions A 6 and A 7.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835 are identical, and in cl. 79, inserted subdivision A 6 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and updated the parenthetical reference in the last sentence of subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Carrying and possession of firearms within state parks. —

Department of Conservation and Recreation does not have the authority to prohibit the carrying and possession of firearms within state parks beyond that currently prohibited by law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ken T. Cuccinelli, II, Member, Senate of Virginia, 08-043, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (9/26/08).

Carrying concealed handguns in state parks. —

The Department of Conservation and Recreation does not have the authority to issue regulations prohibiting, within state parks, the carrying of concealed handguns by valid permit holders. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard H. Black, Member, House of Delegates, 02-074, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 153 (9/9/02).

Department of Conservation and Recreation may regulate swimming

in public parks, natural preserves, and other areas over which the Department exercises supervisory authority, but lacks the authority to regulate swimming in other waters. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Albert C. Pollard, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 10-074, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 50 (8/23/10).

§ 10.1-104.01.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 490, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-104.01

, pertaining to electric vehicle charging stations, derived from Acts 2018, cc. 295, 446.

§ 10.1-104.1.
Department to assist in the nonpoint source pollution management program.

The Department, with the advice of the Board of Conservation and Recreation and the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board and in cooperation with other agencies, organizations, and the public as appropriate, shall assist in the Commonwealth’s nonpoint source pollution management program.

The Department shall be assisted in performing its nonpoint source pollution management responsibilities by Virginia’s soil and water conservation districts. Assistance by the soil and water conservation districts in the delivery of local programs and services may include (i) the provision of technical assistance to advance adoption of conservation management services, (ii) delivery of educational initiatives targeted at youth and adult groups to further awareness and understanding of water quality issues and solutions, and (iii) promotion of incentives to encourage voluntary actions by landowners and land managers in order to minimize nonpoint source pollution contributions to state waters.The provisions of this section shall not limit the powers and duties of other state agencies.

History.

1993, cc. 19, 830; 2004, c. 474; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, nutrient trading, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 474 inserted the A and B designations and added the first paragraph of subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “shall assist in” for “shall have the lead responsibility for” and deleted the last two sentences, which read: “This responsibility includes coordination of the nonpoint source control elements of programs developed pursuant to certain state and federal laws including § 319 of the Clean Water Act and § 6217 of the Coastal Zone Management Act. Further responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the distribution of assigned funds, the identification and establishment of priorities of nonpoint source related water quality problems, and the administration of the Statewide Nonpoint Source Advisory Committee.”

§ 10.1-104.2.
Voluntary nutrient management training and certification program.

The Department shall operate a voluntary nutrient management training and certification program to certify, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board pursuant to subsection D, the competence of persons preparing nutrient management plans for the purpose of (i) assisting landowners and operators in the management of land application of fertilizers, municipal sewage sludges, animal manures, and other nutrient sources for agronomic benefits and for the protection of the Commonwealth’s ground and surface waters and (ii) assisting owners and operators of agricultural land and turf to achieve economic benefits from the effective management and application of nutrients.

The Department shall develop a flexible, tiered, Voluntary Nutrient Management Plan Program to assist owners and operators of agricultural land and turf in (i) preparing nutrient management plans for their own property that meet the nutrient management specifications developed by the Department and (ii) achieving economic benefits for owners and operators as a result of effective nutrient management. The Department shall convene a stakeholder group composed of individuals representing agricultural and environmental organizations to assist in the development of this Program. Individuals representing the agricultural stakeholders shall include both farmers who currently operate farms and agribusiness representatives who serve the farming community. Individuals representing environmental stakeholders shall include at least two members and a staff member of the Virginia Delegation to the Chesapeake Bay Commission and one representative from the Rappahannock River Basin Commission. The Program shall: (a) allow owners and operators of agricultural lands and turf who are not required to have a certified nutrient management plan to prepare their own nutrient management plans; (b) include a tiered approach for lands of different sizes, agricultural production, and nutrient applications; (c) consider similar online programs in other states or sponsored by baccalaureate institutions of higher education; (d) address how the nutrient management plans can be verified and receive credit in the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Model for properties in the Chesapeake Bay watershed; (e) begin testing the software for the Program by July 1, 2013, and begin full implementation by July 1, 2014; and (f) include any other issues related to developing a flexible, tiered, Voluntary Nutrient Management Plan Program for owners and operators of agricultural lands and turf.

Any personal or proprietary information collected pursuant to subsection B shall be exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.), except that the Director may release information that has been transformed into a statistical or aggregate form that does not allow identification of the persons who supplied, or are the subject of, particular information. This subsection shall not preclude the application of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act in all other instances of federal or state regulatory actions.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board shall adopt regulations:

Specifying qualifications and standards for individuals to be deemed competent in nutrient management plan preparation, and providing for the issuance of documentation of certification to such individuals;

Specifying conditions under which a certificate issued to an individual may be suspended or revoked;

Providing for criteria relating to the development of nutrient management plans for various agricultural and urban agronomic practices, including protocols for use by laboratories in determining soil fertility, animal manure nutrient content, or plant tissue nutrient uptake for the purpose of nutrient management;

Establishing fees to be paid by individuals enrolling in the training and certification programs;

Providing for the performance of other duties and the exercise of other powers by the Director as may be necessary to provide for the training and certification of individuals preparing nutrient management plans; and

Giving due consideration to relevant existing agricultural certification programs.

There is hereby established a special, nonreverting fund in the state treasury to be known as the Nutrient Management Training and Certification Fund. The fund shall consist of all fees collected by the Department pursuant to subsection D. No part of the fund, either principal or interest, shall revert to the general fund. The fund shall be administered by the Director, and shall be used solely for the payment of expenses of operating the nutrient management training and certification program.

For the purposes of this section, the term “turf” shall have the same meaning as defined in § 3.2-3600.

History.

1994, c. 159; 2011, cc. 341, 353; 2012, c. 781; 2013, cc. 593, 658.

Cross references.

As to adoption of regulations for the application of regulated products to nonagricultural property, see § 3.2-3601. As to powers and duties of State Water Control Board, see § 62.1-44.15. As to prohibition on land application, marketing and distribution of sewage sludge without permit, see § 62.1-44.19:3.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 341 and 353, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall provide, no later than December 15, 2011, a report to the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources concerning the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The report shall (i) conduct an assessment of the most effective means to encourage the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (ii) determine the most appropriate percentages of slowly available nitrogen to be included in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (iii) recommend the most appropriate effective date for any change, (iv) calculate the costs to the manufacturer and consumer, and (v) provide a review of any other issues related to the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The Department shall consult with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Chesapeake Bay Commission and, at the Department’s discretion, may convene a technical advisory committee of stakeholders concerning the development and content of the report.”

Acts 2012, c. 781, cl. 2, provides: “That if no funds are available to the Department of Conservation and Recreation for the purpose described in clause (e) of subsection B of §

10.1-104.2

of the Code of Virginia as amended in this act, the Department may defer the development of the necessary software until such funds become available.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and directed for transfer from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in accordance with this act shall remain in full force and effect until transferred to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 3 provides: “That the initial actions of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the nutrient management training and certification regulations transferred by this act from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Board shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 4 provides: “That after the transfer of the nutrient management training and certification program, if the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the program in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 5 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation relating to the regulations to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 6 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated prior to the effective date of this act by the Department of Conservation and Recreation to amend the regulations being transferred by this act shall be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board at the time of the transfer of the regulations. Any regulatory action to amend the regulations being transferred that is initiated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation on and after the effective date of this act may be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “baccalaureate institutions of higher education” was substituted for “universities” in clause (c) of subsection B to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 781 added clause (ii) in subsection A; in subsection B, inserted “and turf,” added a new clause (i) designation, inserted new clause (ii), inserted the third and fourth sentences, redesignated former clauses (i) to (vi) as (a) to (f), and substituted the current language in clause (e) for “establish an effective date for implementation”; added subsection C, renumbering the following subsections and correcting an internal reference; added the ending beginning “including protocols” to subdivision 3 in subsection D; added subsection F, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 593 and 658 are identical, and inserted “in accordance with regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board pursuant to subsection D” in subsection A; and substituted “Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board shall” for “Department shall, with the approval of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board” in the introductory language of subsection D.

§ 10.1-104.2:1.
Nitrogen application rates; regulations.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board shall adopt regulations that amend the application rates in the Virginia Nutrient Management Standards and Criteria by incorporating into such regulations or the documents incorporated by reference the recommended application rates for nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer and the recommended application rates for “slow or controlled release fertilizer” and “enhanced efficiency lawn fertilizer,” as such terms are defined and adopted or proposed for adoption by the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials, as described in the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services’ December 2011 “Report on the Use of Slowly Available Nitrogen in Lawn Fertilizer and Lawn Maintenance Fertilizer.”

Such regulatory amendment provided for in subsection A shall follow a fast-track regulatory process established pursuant to § 2.2-4012.1 of the Administrative Process Act and shall be adopted no later than July 1, 2014.

History.

2012, c. 796; 2013, cc. 593, 658.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and directed for transfer from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in accordance with this act shall remain in full force and effect until transferred to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 3 provides: “That the initial actions of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the nutrient management training and certification regulations transferred by this act from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Board shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 4 provides: “That after the transfer of the nutrient management training and certification program, if the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the program in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 5 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation relating to the regulations to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 6 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated prior to the effective date of this act by the Department of Conservation and Recreation to amend the regulations being transferred by this act shall be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board at the time of the transfer of the regulations. Any regulatory action to amend the regulations being transferred that is initiated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation on and after the effective date of this act may be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Association of American Plant Food Control Officials” was substituted for “American Association of Plant Food Control Officials” in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 593 and 658 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board” for “Department” near the beginning, and inserted “or the documents incorporated by reference” following “such regulations”; and substituted “regulatory amendment provided for in subsection A” for “regulations” in subsection B.

§ 10.1-104.3.
Clean Water Farm Award Program.

The Director shall establish the Clean Water Farm Award Program to recognize farms in the Commonwealth which utilize practices designed to protect water quality and soil resources. A farm shall be eligible for recognition upon application from the farmer or the local soil and water conservation district, if the district concurs that the farmer is implementing conservation practices that effectively address agricultural nonpoint source pollutants. Such practices may include vegetative riparian buffers, cover crops, conservation tillage, livestock exclusion from waterways, and nutrient management plans. The Director may establish guidelines for limiting the quantity of annual recipients, receiving and ranking applications, ensuring geographical representation of awards from the major watersheds of the Commonwealth including the Chesapeake Bay watershed, providing local farm recognition through the local soil and water conservation districts, and providing special statewide recognition to select farms. Recognition under this program shall not be a requirement under any other state program.

History.

1998, c. 93; 2009, c. 349.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 349 substituted “implementing conservation practices that effectively address agricultural nonpoint source pollutants. Such practices may include vegetative riparian buffers, cover crops, conservation tillage, livestock exclusion from waterways, and nutrient management plans” for “fully implementing a nutrient management plan” and deleted “to be known as the Bay-Friendly Farm Awards, within the Chesapeake Bay watershed, and as the Clean Water Farm Awards in all other areas of the Commonwealth. The Department shall report to the General Assembly annually by December 1, the names, addresses and location of signs posted at recipient farms” following “recognition to select farms.”

§ 10.1-104.4.
Nutrient management plans required for state lands; review of plans.

On or before July 1, 2006, all state agencies, public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, and other state governmental entities that own land upon which fertilizer, manure, sewage sludge or other compounds containing nitrogen or phosphorus are applied to support agricultural, turf, plant growth, or other uses shall develop and implement a nutrient management plan for such land. The plan shall be in conformance with the following nutrient management requirements:

For all state-owned agricultural and forestal lands where nutrient applications occur, state agencies, public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, and other state governmental entities shall submit site-specific individual nutrient management plans prepared by a certified nutrient management planner pursuant to §

10.1-104.2

and regulations promulgated thereunder. However, where state agencies are conducting research involving nutrient application rate and timing on state-owned agricultural and forestal lands, such lands shall be exempt from the application rate and timing provisions contained in the regulations developed pursuant to §

10.1-104.2

.

For all state-owned lands other than agricultural and forestal lands where nutrient applications occur, state agencies, public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, and other state governmental entities shall submit nutrient management plans prepared by a certified nutrient management planner pursuant to §

10.1-104.2

and regulations promulgated thereunder or planning standards and specifications acceptable to the Department.

Plans or planning standards and specifications submitted under subdivisions A 1 and A 2 shall be reviewed and approved by the Department. Such approved plans and planning standards and specifications shall be in effect for a maximum of three years, and shall be revised and submitted for approval to the Department at least once every three years thereafter.

State agencies, public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, and other state governmental entities shall maintain and properly implement any such nutrient management plan or planning standards or specifications on all areas where nutrients are applied.

The Department may (i) provide technical assistance and training on the development and implementation of a nutrient management plan, (ii) conduct periodic reviews as part of its responsibilities authorized under this section, and (iii) assess an administrative charge to cover a portion of the costs for services associated with its responsibilities authorized under this section.

The Department shall develop written procedures for the development, submission, and the implementation of a nutrient management plan or planning standards and specifications that shall be provided to all state agencies, public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth, and other state governmental entities that own land upon which nutrients are applied.

History.

2005, c. 65.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “public institutions of higher education in the Commonwealth” was substituted for “state colleges and universities” throughout the section to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 10.1-104.5.
Nutrient management plans required for golf courses; penalty.

On or before July 1, 2017, all persons that own land operated as a golf course and upon which fertilizer, manure, sewage sludge, or other compounds containing nitrogen or phosphorous are applied to support turf, plant growth, or other uses shall develop and implement nutrient management plans for such land in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to §

10.1-104.2

. However, such lands shall be exempt from the application rate and timing provisions contained in any regulations developed pursuant to §

10.1-104.2

if research involving nutrient application rate and timing is conducted on such lands.

Nutrient management plans developed pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Department. The Department shall approve or contingently approve such nutrient management plans within 30 days of submission. Such nutrient management plans shall be revised and resubmitted for approval to the Department every five years thereafter or upon a major renovation or redesign of the golf course lands, whichever occurs sooner.

Golf courses shall maintain and properly implement approved nutrient management plans, planning standards, and specifications on all areas where nutrients are applied.

Nutrient management plans shall be made available to the Department upon request.

The Department shall (i) provide technical assistance and training on the development and implementation of nutrient management plans, planning standards, and specifications and (ii) establish, prior to July 1, 2015, a cost-share program specific to golf courses for implementation of this section.

Any information collected pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.).

A golf course owner found to be in violation of this section after July 1, 2017, shall be given 90 days to submit a nutrient management plan to the Department for approval before a $250 civil penalty is imposed. All civil penalties imposed under this section shall be deposited in the Nutrient Management Training and Certification Fund (§

10.1-104.2

).

Golf courses in compliance with this section shall not be subject to local ordinances governing the use or application of fertilizer.

History.

2011, cc. 341, 353.

§ 10.1-104.6.
Supplemental environmental projects.

As used in this section:“Supplemental environmental project” means an environmentally beneficial project undertaken as partial settlement of a civil enforcement action and not otherwise required by law.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board or the Director acting on behalf of the Board or under his own authority in issuing any administrative order, or any court of competent jurisdiction as provided for under this Code, may, in its or his discretion and with the consent of the person subject to the order, provide for such person to undertake one or more supplemental environmental projects. The project shall have a reasonable geographic nexus to the violation or, if no such project is available, shall advance at least one of the declared objectives of the environmental law or regulation that is the basis of the enforcement action. Performance of such projects shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other provision of the order.

The following categories of projects may qualify as supplemental environmental projects, provided the project otherwise meets the requirements of this section: public health, pollution prevention, pollution reduction, environmental restoration and protection, environmental compliance promotion, and emergency planning and preparedness. In determining the appropriateness and value of a supplemental environmental project, the following factors shall be considered by the enforcement authority: net project costs, benefits to the public or the environment, innovation, impact on minority or low income populations, multimedia impact, and pollution prevention. The costs of those portions of a supplemental environmental project that are funded by state or federal low-interest loans, contracts or grants shall be deducted from the net project cost in evaluating the project. In each case in which a supplemental environmental project is included as part of a settlement, an explanation of the project with any appropriate supporting documentation shall be included as part of the case file.

Nothing in this section shall require the disclosure of documents exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§ 2.2-3700 et seq.).

Any decision whether or not to agree to a supplemental environmental project is within the sole discretion of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, Director, or court and shall not be subject to appeal.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or applied in a manner inconsistent with applicable federal law or any applicable requirement for the Commonwealth to obtain or maintain federal delegation or approval of any regulatory program.

History.

2011, c. 505.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2011 act having been §

10.1-104.5

.